Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2207.18
Board, defined.

Board means the Real Property Appraiser Board.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 8;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 11;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 21;

R.S.1943, (2009), § 76-2208;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 10;

R.S.Supp.,2016, § 76-2207.02;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 7.